District of Columbia statutes.
50-1641.07a

Enforcement.

(a)

A violation of this subchapter or the rules issued under authority of this subchapter shall be a civil infraction for the purposes of Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for an infraction of § 50-1641.05 or § 50-1641.06, or any rule promulgated under authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

(c)

Six months after April 8, 2001, the Mayor may begin enforcement of § 50-1641.06(a).

(d)

Six months after the effective date of the rules issued pursuant to § 50-1641.07, the Mayor may begin enforcement of §§ 50-1641.05 and 50-1641.06(b) and (c).

(e)

Revenues collected from enforcement described in subsections (c) and (d) of this section shall be dedicated to any costs associated with conducting such enforcement.

History

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-103, § 8a
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-365, § 2(c), 58 DCR 979